Hawaii statutes.
[§663‑1.57] Owner
to felon; limited liability. (a) An owner, including but not
limited to a public entity, of any estate or any other interest in real
property, whether possessory or nonpossessory, or any agent of the owner
lawfully on the premises by consent of the owner, shall not be liable to any
perpetrator engaged in any of the felonies set forth in subsection (b) for any
injury or death to the perpetrator that occurs upon that property during the
course of or after the commission of such felony, or when a reasonable person
would believe that commission of a felony as set forth in subsection (b) is
imminent; provided that if the perpetrator is injured, the perpetrator is
charged with the criminal offense and convicted of the criminal offense or of a
lesser included felony or misdemeanor.

(b) This section applies to the following
felonies:

(1) Murder in the first or second degree;

(2) Attempted murder in the first or second degree;

(3) Any class A felony as provided in the Hawaii
Penal Code, including any attempt or conspiracy to commit a crime classified as
a class A felony;

(4) Any class B felony involving violence or physical
harm as provided in the Hawaii Penal Code;

(5) Any felony punishable by imprisonment for life;

(6) Any other felony in which the person inflicts serious
bodily injury on another person; and

(7) Any felony in which the person personally used
a firearm or a dangerous or deadly weapon.

(c) The limitation on liability
under this section arises:

(1) At the moment the perpetrator commences the felony to
which this section applies; or

(2) At the moment the owner or agent of the owner
lawfully on the premises by consent of the owner believes that a commission of
a felony under subsection (b) is imminent;

and extends to the moment the perpetrator is no
longer upon the property.

(d) The limitation on liability
under this section applies only when the perpetrator's conduct in furtherance
of the commission of a felony specified in subsection (b)
proximately or legally causes the injury or death.

(e) This section does not limit the liability
of an owner
that otherwise exists for:

(1) Wilful, wanton, or criminal conduct; or

(2) Wilful or malicious failure to guard or warn
against a dangerous condition, use, or structure; or

(3) Injury or death caused to individuals other than
the perpetrator of the felony.

(f) Except with regard to [subsections] (e)(1)
and (e)(3), the limitation of liability under this section shall not be
affected by the failure of the owner to warn the perpetrator of the felony that
the owner is armed and ready to cause bodily harm or death.

(g) For purposes of this section, "owner"
means the owner, the occupant, tenant, or anyone authorized to be on the
property by the owner or the occupant, including a guest or a family or
household member, employee, or agent of the owner lawfully on the premises.

(h) The limitation on liability
provided by this section shall be in addition to any other available defense.
[L 2010, c 97, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next